Arkansas, session 2025, SB91.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 14-16-601 is amended to read as follows:
14-16-601. Rent, rental application fee, and rental deposit control
preemption — Definition.
(a) As used in this section, “local governmental unit” means a
political subdivision of this state, including, but not limited to, without
limitation a county, city, village, or township, if the political subdivision
provides local government services for residents in a geographically limited
area of this state as its primary purpose and has the power to act primarily
on behalf of that area.
(b)(1) A As to leasing private residential or commercial property, and
except as provided under § 18-16-304, a local governmental unit shall not
*LJH008*
02-17-2025 11:10:20 LJH008

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB91
enact, maintain, or enforce an ordinance or resolution that would have the
effect of controlling the amount of rent charged for: leasing private
residential or commercial property
(A) Rent;
(B) Rental application fees; or
(C) Rental deposits.
(2) The preemption against rent, rental application fees, and
rental deposit control in subdivision (b)(1) of this section applies to all:
(A) Landlords;
(B) Property owners;
(C) Property managers;
(D) Tenants;
(E) Prospective tenants; and
(F) Real estate companies doing business in the
State of Arkansas.
(c) This section does not impair the right of any local governmental
unit to manage and control residential property in which the local
governmental unit has a property interest.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 14-54-1409 is amended to read as follows:
14-54-1409. Rent, rental application fee, and rental deposit control
preemption — Definition.
(a) As used in this section, “local governmental unit” means a
political subdivision of this state, including, but not limited to, without
limitation a county, city, village, or township, if the political subdivision
provides local government services for residents in a geographically limited
area of this state as its primary purpose and has the power to act primarily
on behalf of that area.
(b)(1) A As to leasing private residential or commercial property, and
except as provided under § 18-16-304, a local governmental unit shall not
enact, maintain, or enforce an ordinance or resolution that would have the
effect of controlling the amount of rent charged for: leasing private
residential or commercial property
(A) Rent;
(B) Rental application fees; or
(C) Rental deposits.
02-17-2025 11:10:20 LJH008

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB91
(2) The preemption against rent, rental application fees, and
rental deposit control in subdivision (b)(1) of this section applies to all:
(A) Landlords;
(B) Property owners;
(C) Property managers;
(D) Tenants;
(E) Prospective tenants; and
(F) Real estate companies doing business in the
State of Arkansas.
(c) This section does not impair the right of any local governmental
unit to manage and control residential property in which the local
governmental unit has a property interest.

/s/C. Penzo






















02-17-2025 11:10:20 LJH008